Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB195.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) There is hereby established the property tax task force.
The task force shall consist of nine members as follows:
(1) The chairperson of the senate committee on assessment and
taxation;
(2) the chairperson of the house committee on taxation;
(3) the ranking minority member of the senate committee on
assessment and taxation;
(4) the ranking minority member of the house committee on taxation;
(5) two members to be appointed by the president of the senate who
are members of the senate;
(6) one member to be appointed by the minority leader of the senate
who is a member of the senate;
(7) one member to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives who is a member of the house of representatives; and
(8) one member to be appointed by the minority leader of the house
of representatives who is a member of the house of representatives.
(b) Any vacancy in the membership of the task force shall be filled in
the same manner as the original appointment.
(c) A member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate
pursuant to subsection (a)(5) shall serve as chairperson of the task force.
(d) The task force may meet at any time and at any place within the
state on the call of the chairperson. A quorum of the task force shall be five
members. All actions of the task force shall be by motion adopted by a
majority of those members present when there is a quorum.
(e) Subject to approval by the legislative coordinating council, the
legislative members of the task force attending meetings authorized by the
task force shall be paid amounts provided in K.S.A. 75-3223(e), and
amendments thereto.
(f) The task force shall review the property tax system in Kansas and
develop recommendations and suggest improvements to law that would

SB 195 2
provide for a more efficient or cost effective property taxing system,
including, but not limited to, property valuations and tax levies on real
property in Kansas.
(g) On or before January 31, 2026, the task force shall make and
submit a report to the legislature concerning any recommendations and
suggestions to improve the law.
(h) The staff of the office of revisor of statutes, the legislative
research department and the division of legislative administrative services
shall provide assistance as may be requested by the task force.
(i) The provisions of this section shall expire on January 31, 2026.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.